Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.056, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Cooperation. deleted text begin To be eligible fordeleted text end Medical assistancedeleted text begin ,deleted text end applicants and recipients deleted text begin mustdeleted text end new text begin maynew text end cooperate with the state and local agency to identify potentially liable third-party payers and assist the state in obtaining third-party paymentsdeleted text begin , unless good cause for noncooperation is determined according to Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, part 433.147deleted text end . "Cooperation" includes identifying any third party who may be liable for care and services provided under this chapter to the applicant, recipient, or any other family member for whom application is made and providing relevant information to assist the state in pursuing a potentially liable third party. Cooperation also includes providing information about a group health plan for which the person may be eligible and if the plan is determined cost-effective by the state agency and premiums are paid by the local agency or there is no cost to the recipient, deleted text begin they mustdeleted text end new text begin the person maynew text end enroll or remain enrolled with the group. For purposes of this subdivision, coverage provided by the Minnesota Comprehensive Health Association under chapter 62E shall not be considered group health plan coverage or cost-effective by the state and local agency. Cost-effective insurance premiums approved for payment by the state agency and paid by the local agency are eligible for reimbursement according to section 256B.19.